District of Columbia statutes.
28-4515

Uniformity.

It is the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia that in construing this chapter, a court of competent jurisdiction may use as a guide interpretations given by federal courts to comparable antitrust statutes.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368

History

1981 Ed., § 28-4515.

Prior Codifications